District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Office of Human Rights Rulemaking Authority Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. The Language Access Act of 2004, effective June 19, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-167;
D.C. Official Code § 2-1931 et seq.) is amended as follows:
(a) Section 6 (D.C. Official Code § 2-1935) is amended by adding new subsections (d)
through (i), to read as follows:
“(d) A covered entity shall be strictly liable for failure to comply with the requirements of
this act.
“(e) To establish a violation, the complainant need only demonstrate that:
"(1) They were entitled to language access services under this act; and
"(2) Such services were not provided in the manner or timeframe required by this


act.
"(f) Proof of intent, discrimination, or animus shall not be required to establish non-
compliance.
“(g) Lack of funding, staffing limitations, or administrative burden shall not constitute a
defense to liability.”.
“(h) Upon a finding of non-compliance, the Director of Language Access shall order
remedies sufficient to place the complainant in the position they would have been in but for the
denial of required language access. Such remedies shall include:
"(1) Corrective action; and
"(2) Statutory damages awarded to the complainant.
“(i) Statutory damages awarded under this section shall be paid directly to the
complainant and shall not be contingent upon proof of actual damages.".
(b) A new section 9a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 9a. Rulemaking.
The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules
to implement the provisions of this act.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
(a) Section 2(a) shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
budget and financial plan.
(b) Section 2(b) shall apply as of June 19, 2004.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal


impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.